Maine, session 132, LD2095.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 8 MRSA §374, sub-§1, ¶L, as amended by PL 1997, c. 301, §1, is further
amended to read:
L. The apportionment of the total annual revenue accruing from the sale of lottery
tickets or shares and from all other sources for the payment of prizes to the holders of
winning tickets or shares; for the payment of costs incurred in the operation and
administration of the lotteries, including the expenses of the commission and the costs
resulting from any contract or contracts entered into for promotional, advertising,
consulting or operational services or for the purchase or lease of lottery equipment and
materials; for the repayment of the money appropriated to the State Lottery Fund; and
for transfer to the General Fund for distribution pursuant to section 387; and
Sec. 2. 8 MRSA §374, sub-§1, ¶M, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 301, §2, is amended
to read:
Page 1 - 132LR2675(03)

M. The imprinting on all lottery tickets sold in the State of the overall odds of winning
a prize for each game.;
Sec. 3. 8 MRSA §374, sub-§1, ¶N is enacted to read:
N. The quantity of tickets or shares that may be sold to a person by an agent; and
Sec. 4. 8 MRSA §374, sub-§1, ¶O is enacted to read:
O. The bulk purchase of tickets or shares as prohibited pursuant to section 381-A.
Sec. 5. 8 MRSA §376, sub-§1, ¶E, as amended by PL 2011, c. 310, §10, is further
amended to read:
E. Insufficiency of the number of tickets sold by a person licensed to sell lottery tickets
or shares; or
Sec. 6. 8 MRSA §376, sub-§1, ¶F, as amended by PL 2011, c. 310, §10, is further
amended to read:
F. A material change, since issuance of the license, with respect to any of the matters
required to be considered by the director under section 375 or as defined by rules
adopted under this chapter.; or
Sec. 7. 8 MRSA §376, sub-§1, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. Knowingly selling tickets or shares to a person attempting to make a bulk purchase
in violation of section 381-A or any rules adopted to implement section 381-A.
Sec. 8. 8 MRSA §381-A is enacted to read:
§381-A. Bulk purchase of tickets or shares prohibited
1. Bulk purchase; definition. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
indicates, "bulk purchase" means the purchase, in aggregate, of tickets or shares in a lottery
game in an amount exceeding $25,000 that:
A. Occurs in a single transaction or multiple transactions;
B. Is made at a single retail location or multiple retail locations; and
C. Is made by an individual or multiple individuals acting in concert.
2. Bulk purchases prohibited. The bulk purchase of tickets or shares for a lottery
game is prohibited.
3. Refusal of payment. The commission may refuse payment of a prize for a winning
ticket or share that was purchased as part of a bulk purchase in violation of subsection 2.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2675(03)